Washington statutes.
RCW 15.13.500

Suspension of license—Reissuance. (Expires July 1, 2030.)

The department shall immediately suspend any license issued under this chapter if the holder of the license has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order. If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for licensure during the suspension, reissuance of the license shall be automatic upon the department's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the person is in compliance with the order.

[ 2007 c 335 s 7.]

NOTES:

Expiration date—2019 c 206; 2013 c 72; 2007 c 335: See note following RCW 15.13.250.